Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 179. Vermont Fire Service Training Council

§ 3151.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Council” means the Vermont Fire Service Training Council.

“Fire service” means activities related to fire prevention, investigation, or suppression, or fire-related rescue.

“Firefighter” means a member of a State, municipal, or county fire department or a privately organized fire department who is responsible for fire suppression, prevention, or investigation, or fire-related rescue.

“Full-time firefighter” means a firefighter who receives compensation for performing fire service duties of a predictable and continuing nature more than 32 hours per week and more than 25 weeks per year.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 3152.
Vermont Fire Service Training Council created.

The Vermont Fire Service Training Council is created. The Council shall consist of 12 members. The Commissioner of Labor; the Commissioner of Public Safety; the Director of Fire Safety; the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation; the Secretary of Education; and the Commissioner of Health, or their designees, shall serve as ex officio members of the Council. Six members shall be appointed by the Governor for three-year terms. Of the appointed members, the Governor shall appoint one member who, during incumbency, is a representative of the Vermont Career Fire Chiefs Association; one member who, at the time of appointment, is a representative of the Professional Firefighters of Vermont; one member who, at the time of appointment, is a representative of the Vermont Fire Chiefs Association and who is a fire chief of a volunteer fire department; one member who, at the time of appointment, is a representative of the Vermont State Firefighters Association and who is a volunteer firefighter; one member who, during incumbency, is an employee, officer, or director of an insurance company domiciled in this State and subject to the assessment under

32 V.S.A. § 8557

; and one member of the public who is not involved in fire service. To the extent possible, appointments shall be geographically representative.

Members of the Council shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual mileage traveled at the rate paid State employees.

A majority of the members of the Council shall constitute a quorum. The Council shall act only by vote of a majority of its members present and voting at a meeting at which there is a quorum.

The Council shall meet at least twice a year. Special meetings may be called by the chairperson or upon request of a majority of the members of the Council.

In the event of a vacancy occurring in the membership of the Council, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment with a person whose appointment shall terminate on the date on which the original appointment would have terminated if the vacancy had not occurred.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1995, No. 41

, § 1;

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 1, 2005;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2007, No. 8

, § 1;

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 35, eff. June 6, 2008;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 261.

§ 3153.
Powers and duties.

The Council shall:

Establish by rules adopted pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25:

Minimum basic training courses for full-time firefighters and minimum basic training courses that shall be made available, on a voluntary basis, to other firefighters. Courses for persons who are not full-time firefighters shall be reasonable in terms of length, cost, location, and availability in light of the rural nature of the State and the high percentage of volunteer participation in fire service. They shall incorporate any distinct or limited functions performed by such firefighters.

Standards for approval of fire service training courses, certification of instructors, and the grounds for revocation of approval or certification.

Training requirements for certification and recertification of firefighters.

Standards for recertification of firefighters who have not maintained their certification.

Standards relating to waivers of the training requirements of section 3155 of this title.

Encourage local governmental units to participate in the training programs established under this chapter and aid in the establishment of adequate training facilities.

Serve as the lead agency for hazardous chemical or substance incident training provided to fire service personnel statewide. All State agencies providing such training to fire service personnel shall coordinate the training with the Vermont Fire Service Training Council.

The Council may:

subject to the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 5

, accept contributions, capital grants, gifts, services, and funds from any source;

sell hats, shirts, and other memorabilia. Proceeds from these sales shall be retained by the Council to support the purposes of this chapter; and

perform such acts as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1993, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. June 14, 1994;

1995, No. 63

, § 73, eff. May 4, 1995;

1997, No. 74

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 49

, § 195;

2007, No. 8

, § 2.

§ 3154.
Chief Fire Service Training Officer; powers and duties.

Subject to the approval of the Governor, the Commissioner of Public Safety shall appoint a Chief Fire Service Training Officer. The Commissioner shall seek the recommendation of the Council before selecting a Chief Fire Service Training Officer for the Governor’s approval. The Chief Fire Service Training Officer shall:

have administrative experience and be knowledgeable about matters relating to fire service;

be an exempt State employee; and

hold office at the pleasure of the Commissioner.

The Chief Fire Service Training Officer shall have the following powers and duties, which shall be exercised under the supervision of the Director of Fire Safety and in accordance with rules adopted by the Council:

to certify instructors;

to certify firefighters;

to certify fire officers;

to certify satisfactory completion of other courses;

to consult and cooperate with fire service training schools and other allied agencies; and

to perform such other acts as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her powers and duties under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 1, 2005;

2005, No. 8

, § 4, eff. April 25, 2005;

2007, No. 8

, § 3.

§ 3155.
Training required.

A full-time firefighter shall complete a minimum basic training course approved by the Council and the continuing training required by the Council for recertification in the time and manner prescribed by the Council.

Upon written request from a chief of a fire department, the Council may waive the training required under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2007, No. 8

, § 4.

§ 3156.
Repealed. 2007, No. 8, § 6.

§ 3157.
Division of Fire Safety Special Fund.

The Division of Fire Safety Special Fund is established. The Fund shall be administered by the Commissioner of Public Safety. Payments from the Fund may be made to support training programs and activities authorized by this chapter, maintenance and operation of any permanent training facilities operated by the Division of Fire Safety and the administrative expenses of the Division of Fire Safety. The Fund shall consist of all monies received from tuitions, contributions, capital grants, or other funds received by the Council, transfers from the Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund pursuant to

8 V.S.A. § 80(c)

, and assessments of insurance companies under

32 V.S.A. § 8557(a)

, together with monies appropriated to the Fund. Monies remaining in the Fund at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried forward and remain in the Fund. Disbursement from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants drawn by the Commissioner of Finance and Management.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2003, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 1, 2005;

2005, No. 71

, § 269, eff. June 21, 2005;

2007, No. 8

, § 5;

2021, No. 20

, § 190.